lt-LT: Stimuliatoriaus antgalio forma: Kūgis; Smailėjantis; Kita
da: Stimulatorspidsform: Konisk; Tilspidset; Andet
cs: Tvar špičky stimulátoru: Kónický; Tapered; Jiné
sk-SK: Tvar hrotu stimulátora: Kónický; Zúžený; Iné
pl: Kształt końcówki elektrostymulatora: Stożkowaty; Zwężane; Inne
pt-BR: Formato da ponta do estimulador: Cônico; Cônica; Outro
ru: Форма кончика стимулятора: Конический; Усеченный; Другое
ko: 자극기 팁 모양: 코니컬; 테이퍼드; 기타
it: Forma della punta dello stimolatore: Conico; Affusolato; Altro
sl-SI: Oblika konice stimulatorja: Stožec; Stožčast; Drugo
fr: Forme de la pointe du stimulateur: Conique; Directionnel marqué; Autre
hr-HR: Oblik vrha stimulatora: Konusni; Suženog vrha; Ostalo
zh-CN: 刺激器尖端形状: 锥形; 锥形; 其他
tr: Stimülatör uç şekli: Konik; Konik; Diğer
hu: Stimulátorhegy alakja: Kúp; Kúpos; Egyéb
bg-BG: Форма на върха на стимулатора: Коничен; Конусовиден; Други
nl: Vorm stimulatortip: Conisch; Taps toelopend; Andere
ro-RO: Forma vârfului stimulatorului: Conică; Pană; Altele
vi: Hình dạng đầu kích thích: Hình nón; Vót nhọn; Khác
th: รูปร่างปลายหัวของเครื่องนวด: ทรงกรวย; ตัดเฉียง; อื่นๆ
sv: Form på stimulatorspets: Konisk; Avsmalnande; Övrigt
pt-PT: Formato da ponta do estimulador: Cónico; Afunilado; Outro
de: Form der Stimulatorspitze: Konisch; Tapered; Sonstiges
fi: Stimulaattorin kärjen muoto: Kartiomainen; Kapeneva; Muu
ja: スティミュレータ先端形状: 円錐形; テーパード; その他
nb: Stimulatorspissform: Konisk; Avsmalnet; Annet
es: Forma de la punta del estimulador: Cónico; Cónico; Otros
en: Stimulator tip shape: Conical; Tapered; Other
el: Σχήμα μύτης διεγέρτη: Κωνικός; Κωνική; Άλλο
zh-TW: 刺激器尖端形狀: 圓錐型; 楔型; 其他